Illinois, session 104th, SB2185.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Unified Code of Corrections is amended by 5adding Section 3-6-2.1 as follows: 6    (730 ILCS 5/3-6-2.1 new)7    Sec. 3-6-2.1. Medication for opioid use disorder. 8    (a) In this Section:9    "Clinically indicated" means a medical procedure or 10treatment is based upon the treatment provider's medical 11judgment in accordance with the current generally accepted 12standards of care. 13    "Medication assisted treatment" means the use of U.S. 14Federal Drug Administration-approved medications, in 15combination with counseling and behavioral therapies, to 16provide a whole patient approach to the treatment of substance 17use disorders.18     "Medications for opioid use disorder" means the use of 19U.S. Federal Drug Administration-approved medications to treat 20substance use disorders.21    (b) Within 24 hours of admission to a correctional 22institution or facility, each committed person shall be 23screened for substance use disorders as part of an initial and   SB2185- 2 -LRB104 10818 RLC 20899 b1ongoing substance use screening and assessment process. This 2process includes screening and assessment for opioid use 3disorders.4    (c) A committed person who is admitted to a correctional 5institution or facility while under the medical care of a 6licensed physician, a licensed physician assistant, or a 7licensed nurse practitioner and who is taking medication at 8the time of admission pursuant to a valid prescription as 9verified by the individual's pharmacy of record, primary care 10provider, other licensed care provider, or a prescription 11monitoring or information system, shall have that medication 12continued and provided by the Department pending an evaluation 13by a licensed physician, a licensed physician assistant, or a 14licensed nurse practitioner and subject to the treatment 15provider's medical judgment. The Department may defer 16provision of a validly prescribed medication in accordance 17with this subsection if, in the judgment of a licensed 18physician, a licensed physician assistant, or a licensed nurse 19practitioner, continuation of the medication is no longer 20clinically indicated.21    A committed person who is admitted to a correctional 22institution or facility while under the medical care of a 23licensed physician, a licensed physician assistant, or a 24licensed nurse practitioner and who is taking medication for 25an opioid use disorder or participating in medication assisted 26treatment at the time of admission pursuant to a valid   SB2185- 3 -LRB104 10818 RLC 20899 b1prescription as verified by the individual's pharmacy of 2record, primary care provider, other licensed care provider, 3or a prescription monitoring or information system, shall have 4the committed person's medication continued and provided by 5the Department pending an evaluation by a licensed physician, 6a licensed physician assistant, or a licensed nurse 7practitioner and subject to the treatment provider's medical 8judgment. The Department may defer provision of a validly 9prescribed medication in accordance with this subsection if, 10in the judgment of a licensed physician, a licensed physician 11assistant, or a licensed nurse practitioner, continuation of 12the medication is no longer clinically indicated. An 13individual participating in a medication assisted treatment 14program may have counseling and behavioral therapies continued 15to the extent possible.16    If at any time a committed person screens positive as 17having or being at risk for an opioid use disorder, is 18diagnosed with an opioid use disorder or is exhibiting 19symptoms of withdrawal from an opioid use disorder, and 20medication assisted treatment is clinically indicated by a 21licensed physician, a licensed physician assistant, or a 22licensed nurse practitioner, then the individual may consent 23to commence medications for opioid use disorder, which shall 24be provided by the Department. The committed person shall be 25authorized to receive the medication immediately and for as 26long as clinically indicated.  SB2185- 4 -LRB104 10818 RLC 20899 b1    (d) The licensed practitioner who makes the clinical 2judgment to discontinue the use of medication shall enter the 3reason for the discontinuance to be entered into the committed 4person's medical record, specifically stating the reason for 5discontinuance. The individual shall be provided, both orally 6and in writing, with a specific explanation of the decision to 7discontinue the medication.8    (e) As part of the reentry planning, the Department shall 9commence medications for opioid use disorder prior to an 10individual's release if:11        (1) the individual screens positive as having an 12    opioid use disorder, being at risk for an opioid use 13    disorder, or exhibiting symptoms of withdrawal from an 14    opioid use disorder;15        (2) medication assisted treatment is clinically 16    indicated by a licensed physician, a licensed physician 17    assistant, or a licensed nurse practitioner; and18        (3) The individual consents to commence medications 19    for opioid use disorder.20    Upon reentry, the Department shall provide an individual 21participating in medication assisted treatment with a referral 22to a community-based provider who may assist the individual 23with continued medications for opioid use disorder and 24medication assisted treatment care.